Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407.21
Benefits; available other than on contract anniversary; how calculated.

Any paid-up annuity, cash surrender or death benefits available at any time, other than on the contract anniversary under any contract with fixed scheduled considerations, shall be calculated with allowance for the lapse of time and the payment of any scheduled considerations beyond the beginning of the contract year in which cessation of payment of considerations under the contract occurs.

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 17.